Idaho, session 2026, S1452.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 22 of House Bill No. 1362, if enacted by the
Second Regular Session of the Sixty-eighth Idaho Legislature, be, and the
same is hereby amended to read as follows:
SECTION 22. IDAHO DIGITAL LEARNING ACADEMY. The Idaho Digital
Learning Academy (IDLA), created pursuant to Chapter 55, Title 33,
Idaho Code, shall utilize state-appropriated funds for the period
July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, to achieve the following:
(1) Tuition charged by IDLA to Idaho school districts and ch-
arter schools shall not exceed $40.00 per enrollment.
(2) (1) Provide remedial coursework for students failing to
achieve proficiency in one or more areas of Idaho's standards-based
tests.
(3) (2) Pursuant to State Board of Education rule, IDAPA
08.02.03, provide advanced opportunities, including access to dual
credit courses, for students.
The preceding list shall not be construed as excluding other
instruction and training that may be provided by the IDLA.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.